myspell/de_DE.dic
abbrannte/Z
abfeilen/DIXY
abfloss/Z
abhielt/Z
abklang/Z
abklären/DIXY
abmalen/DIXY
abpfiff/Z
abreagieren/DIOXY
abrunden/DIXY
abschied/Z
absichern/DIXY
absprach/Z
abteufen/IXY
abtrug/Z
abzog/Z
abzwicken/DIXY
administrieren/DIOXY
akzentuieren/DIOXY
amputieren/DIOXY
amüsieren/DIOXY
anbrach/Z
anfeuern/DIXY
anfing/Z
anhielt/Z
anklicken/DIXY
annoncieren/DIOXY
annullieren/DIOXY
anpries/Z
anschloss/Z
anschmiegen/DIXY
antasten/DIXY
antraf/Z
anwarf/Z
archivieren/DIOXY
äße/Z
assoziieren/BDIOXY
aufbrach/Z
auffräße/Z
aufging/Z
aufhetzen/DIXY
aufließe/Z
aufpassen/DIXY
aufprobieren/DIOXY
aufschrauben/DIXY
aufschrie/Z
auftrat/Z
aufwachen/DIXY
ausbrach/Z
ausbreiten/DIXY
ausgab/Z
ausklopfen/DIXY
ausließ/Z
auspacken/DIXY
ausprobieren/DIOXY
aussah/Z
ausschlachten/BDIXY
austrat/Z
austüfteln/DIXY
autorisieren/IOXY
barst/Z
bauen/DIVXY
beängstigen/DIOXY
beäugen/DIOXY
bedrucken/BDIOXY
beenden/DIOXY
beerdigen/DIOXY
befahl/Z
befördern/DIOXY
befürworten/DIOXY
begab/Z
begrenzen/DIOXY
begütigen/DIOXY
behalf/Z
beherbergen/DIOXY
beitrug/Z
bejahen/DIOXY
bekämpfen/DIOXY
beklecksen/DIOXY
belächeln/DIOXY
belehren/DIOXY
belud/Z
bemächtigen/DIOXY
bemalen/DIOXY
benebeln/DIOXY
bepflanzen/DIOXY
bereichern/DIOXY
bereithielt/Z
berichten/DIOXY
berief/Z
beruhigen/DIOXY
besäße/Z
beschämen/DIOXY
beschlagnahmen/DIOXY
beschriebe/Z
beschweren/DIOXY
beschwipsen/DIOXY
besiedeln/DIOXY
besprengen/DIOXY
bestahl/Z
bestellen/DIOXY
bestücken/BDIOXY
bestürmen/DIOXY
betäuben/DIOXY
betrauern/DIOXY
betrug/Z
bevollmächtigen/DIOXY
bewachen/DIOXY
bewältigen/DIOXY
bewirtschaften/DIOXY
bewog/Z
bezwecken/DIOXY
blechen/DIXY
blieb/EVZ
brannte/VZ
broschieren/DIOXY
brühen/DIVXY
choreographieren/DIOXY
daherkam/Z
dahinstelzen/DIXY
darbot/Z
davonging/Z
decodieren/IXYDO
degenerieren/DIOXY
deinstallieren/BDIOXY
dekretieren/DIOXY
demontieren/DIOXY
deprimieren/DIOXY
dereferenzieren/BDIOXY
detaillieren/DIOXY
differenzieren/DIOXYB
diskutieren/BDIOXY
divergieren/DIXY
dokumentieren/DIOXY
drauflosging/ZE
dressieren/DIOXY
ducken/DIXY
durchflog/Z
durchkämmen/DIOXY
durchmischen/DIOXY
durchpflügen/DIXY
durchschlug/Z
durchsetzen/BDIOXY
durchwühlen/DIOXY
duschen/DIXY
einbrachte/Z
einfiel/Z
eingewöhnen/DIOXY
einkopieren/DIOXY
einläuten/DIXY
einlief/Z
einrenken/DIXY
einsah/Z
einstellen/BDIXY
einstrich/Z
einzog/Z
eliminieren/BDIOXY
emporblicken/DIXY
emporschoss/Z
enervieren/DIOXY
entbrannte/Z
enteignen/DIOXY
entfilzen/DIOXY
entgegenarbeiten/DIXY
entgegensah/Z
enthaupten/IOXY
enthielt/Z
entlud/Z
entmannen/DIOXY
entpacken/DIXY
entsann/Z
entschulden/BDIOXY
entschwand/Z
entwarf/Z
entwerten/DIOXY
entwickeln/BDIOXY
erbeuten/DIOXY
erbrächte/Z
ereilen/DIOXY
erfand/Z
erfreuen/DIOXY
erging/ZE
erheitern/DIOXY
erkämpfen/DIOXY
erkannte/Z
erlangen/DIOXY
erließ/Z
ermöglichen/DIOXY
erniedrigen/DIOXY
errechnen/DIOXY
erriet/Z
ersinnen/DIOXY
erstach/Z
erstaunen/DIOXY
ertönen/DIOXY
erwarb/Z
erwirken/DIOXY
erzielen/BDIOXY
explodieren/DIOXY
faseln/DIXY
fehlschlug/Z
feststand/Z
fiebern/DIXY
flöge/Z
flüstern/DIXY
focht/VZ
fokussieren/DIOXY
fortrannte/Z
fragen/BDIXY
freihielt/Z
funkeln/DIXY
gäb/Z
garantieren/DIOXY
gefiel/ZE
geleiten/DIOXY
geradebog/Z
gewann/Z
gewichten/DIOXY
gliedern/DIXY
glitt/Z
hageln/DIXY
half/VZ
hegen/DIXY
heimkam/Z
heranging/ZE
heraufbeschwor/Z
herausfordern/DIXY
herauskam/Z
heraustrat/Z
hereinlegen/DIXY
herfuhr/Z
herumreisen/IXYD
herunterfuhr/Z
hervorbrachte/Z
hervorquoll/Z
hervortrat/Z
hinaufführen/DIXY
hinauffuhr/Z
hinausgriff/Z
hinbewegen/IXYDO
hineinsah/Z
hineinschauen/IXYD
hing/ZE
hinterherwinken/IXYD
hinterließ/Z
hinunterstieg/Z
hob/Z
holen/DIXYW
implizieren/DIOXY
implodieren/DIOXY
informieren/DIOXY
instruieren/DIOXY
integrieren/BDIOXY
involvieren/DIOXY
jaulen/DIXY
kaschieren/BDIOXY
kasernieren/DIOXY
klaffen/DIXY
kneten/BDIXY
kniff/VZ
kombinieren/BDIOXY
komprimieren/BDIXY
konservieren/BDIOXY
konzipieren/DIOXY
koordinieren/DIOXY
kreuzen/DIXY
kurieren/BDIOXY
lag/Z
lähmen/DIXY
lernen/DIVXY
litt/Z
loshetzen/IXYD
lud/VZ
marinieren/DIOXY
massieren/DIOXY
missgönnen/DIOXY
misslang/Z
mitberechnen/IXYDO
mitkam/Z
mitprotokollieren/IXYDO
moderieren/DIOXY
motorisieren/DIOXY
nachdachte/Z
nachfühlen/BDIXY
nachließ/Z
nähen/DIVXY
nannte/Z
neutralisieren/DIOXY
niederschrieb/Z
notieren/DIOXY
oszillieren/DIOXY
packen/DIXY
perforieren/DIOXY
planen/BDIXY
porträtieren/DIOXY
prahlen/DIXY
pries/Z
produzieren/BDIOXY
prostituieren/DIOXY
quantifizieren/BDIOXY
radeln/DIXY
reagieren/DIXY
reduzieren/DIOXY
reinstallieren/IXYDO
rekonstruieren/BDIOXY
retuschieren/DIOXY
revidieren/DIOXY
rief/Z
ritt/Z
rumspielen/IXYD
sandte/VZ
säße/Z
schaben/DIXY
schattieren/DIOXY
schichten/DIXY
schien/Z
schliff/Z
schlummern/DIXY
schmolz/VZ
schnattern/DIXY
schrie/VZ
schrumpfen/DIXY
schwang/Z
schwirren/DIXY
sei/Z
signieren/DIOXY
sistieren/DIOXY
sog/Z
spionieren/DIXY
sprang/Z
stak/Z
stapfen/DIXY
starb/VZ
stenografieren/DIOXY
stieß/VZ
stilllegen/DIXY
stückeln/DIXY
summieren/DIOXY
taillieren/DIOXY
tat/Z
terrorisieren/DIOXY
testieren/DIOXY
trampeln/DIXY
trank/Z
trassieren/DIOXY
trollen/DIXY
überbracht/AZ
überbrücken/BDIOXY
überdauern/DIOXY
übergab/Z
überkleben/DIOXY
überlegen/ADIOXY
überlief/Z
überqueren/DIOXY
überquoll/Z
überschlief/Z
übersetzen/BDIOXY
übersiedeln/DIOXY
übertrat/Z
überwachen/DIOXY
umbauen/DIOXY
umdachte/Z
umfluten/DIOXY
umgoss/Z
umklappen/DIXY
umorganisieren/DIOXY
umrang/Z
umschichten/DIXY
umsprang/Z
umwickeln/DIOXY
unterband/Z
unterdrücken/DIOXY
unterging/ZE
unterlief/Z
unterrichten/DIOXY
unterschlug/Z
unterzog/Z
variieren/BDIOXY
verabreichen/DIOXY
verarmen/DIOXY
verbauern/DIOXY
verblöden/DIOXY
verdampfen/DIOXY
verdichten/DIOXY
verdrahten/DIOXY
veredeln/DIOXY
vereinheitlichen/DIOXY
verengen/DIOXY
verflachen/DIOXY
verfremden/DIOXY
vergittern/DIOXY
verheddern/DIOXY
verheeren/DIOXY
verhunzen/DIOXY
verklagen/DIOXY
verklären/DIOXY
verkraften/DIOXY
verlängern/DIOXY
verlangsamen/DIOXY
verlottern/DIOXY
vermissen/DIOXY
vermuten/DIOXY
verpacken/DIOXY
verprivatisieren/IXYDO
verpulvern/DIOXY
verriegeln/DIOXY
verschachern/DIOXY
verschandeln/DIOXY
verschleppen/DIOXY
verschmutzen/DIOXY
verschrotten/DIOXY
versiegen/DIOXY
versperren/DIOXY
verständigen/DIOXY
verstricken/DIOXY
verteilen/DIOXY
vertrocknen/DIOXY
vervollkommnen/DIOXY
verwarnen/DIOXY
verweltlichen/DIOXY
verwünschen/DIOXY
verzärteln/DIOXY
verzinsen/DIOXY
vorantrieb/Z
vorausbestimmen/IXYDOB
vorausbezahlen/IXYDO
vorherrschen/DIXY
vorsah/Z
wackeln/DIXY
wegführen/DIXY
wegging/ZE
weiterbefördern/IXYD
weitererzählen/IXYDO
wetzen/DIXY
widerspräche/Z
wiehern/DIXY
wuchs/VZ
xerographieren/IOXY
zählen/BDIVXY
zerfiel/Z
zermartern/DIOXY
zerschmolz/Z
zerstäuben/DIOXY
zieren/DIVXY
zog/VZ
zügeln/DIXY
zurechtlegen/IXYD
zurückgriff/Z
zurückschauen/IXYD
zurückverfolgen/IXYDO
zusammenbrach/Z
zusammenfalten/IXYD
zusammenscharen/IXYD
